Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-187.02
Qualified dairy, defined.

Qualified dairy means a milk production facility with a Grade A milk producer permit or a manufacturing grade milk producer permit pursuant to section 2-3968.

Laws 2021, LB572, § 9.